Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 5
RELINQUISHMENT AND ADOPTION

Editor's note:
This title was repealed and reenacted in 1987. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note following the title heading.

Law reviews:
For article, "Difficult Issues in Adoption - Part 1", see 24

C
olo. Law. 851 (1994); for article, "Difficult Issues in Adoption - Part 2", see 24

C
olo. Law. 1083 (1994); for casenote, "Inappropriate Application of the Best Interests of the Child Standard Leads to Worst Case Scenario: In re C.C.R.S.", see 68 U. Colo. L. Rev. 259 (1997).

Section

PART 1 RELINQUISHMENT

PART 2 ADOPTION

PART 3 ACCESS TO ADOPTION INFORMATION

PART 4 ACCESS TO NONIDENTIFYING
ADOPTION INFORMATION